Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
CHAPTER 18A State Personnel

18A.005.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:

“Appointing authority” means the agency head or any person whom he has authorized by law to designate to act on behalf of the agency with respect to employee appointments, position establishments, payroll documents, register requests, waiver requests, requests for certification, or other position actions. Such designation shall be in writing and signed by both the agency head and his designee. Prior to the exercise of appointing authority, such designation shall be filed with the secretary;

“Base salary or wages” means the compensation to which an employee is entitled under the salary schedules adopted pursuant to the provisions of KRS

18A.030

and

18A.110

. Base salary or wages shall be adjusted as provided under the provisions of KRS

18A.355

and

48.130

;

“Board” means the Personnel Board created by KRS

18A.045

;

“Career employee” shall mean a state employee with sixteen (16) or more years of permanent full-time state service, or the part-time employment equivalent of at least sixteen (16) years of full-time state service. The service may have been in the classified service, the unclassified service, or a combination thereof;

“Certification” means the referral of the name of one (1) or more qualified prospective employees by the secretary on request of an appointing officer for consideration in filling a position in the classified service;

“Class” means a group of positions sufficiently similar as to duties performed, scope of discretion and responsibility, minimum requirements of training, experience, or skill, and such other characteristics that the same title, the same tests of fitness, and the same schedule of compensation have been or may be applied to each position in the group;

“Classified employee” means an employee appointed to a position in the classified service whose appointment and continued employment are subject to the classified service provisions of this chapter;

“Classified position” means a position in the executive branch of state government that is not exempt from the classified service under KRS Chapter 16, KRS

18A.115

, KRS Chapter 151B, or any other provision of law;

“Classified service” includes all the employment subject to the terms of this chapter except for those positions expressly cited in KRS

18A.115

; a “classified position” is a position in the classified service;

“Secretary” means the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet as provided for in KRS

18A.015

;

“Demotion” means a change in the rank of an employee from a position in one (1) class to a position in another class having a lower minimum salary range and less discretion or responsibility;

“Cabinet” means the Personnel Cabinet provided for in KRS

18A.015

, unless the context indicates otherwise;

“Eligible” refers to a person who has made a passing score on any examination required under KRS

18A.010

to

18A.200

or who has qualified to be placed on a register;

“Employee” means a person regularly appointed to a position in the state service for which he is compensated on a full-time, part-time, or interim basis;

“Federally funded time-limited employee” means an employee in the unclassified service, appointed to a position that is funded one hundred percent (100%) by a federal grant or grants. An employee appointed to a federally funded time-limited position shall be required to meet the minimum requirements for the classification in which he or she is hired and, subject to the provisions of KRS

18A.113

, shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority during a period of time that shall not exceed the life of the federal grant that funds the position. A federally funded time-limited employee who has been aggrieved by notice of disciplinary action or termination, other than an action based on expiration of the federal grant funding, may petition the appointing authority of the agency for the opportunity to be heard by the appointing authority or his designee prior to the effective date of the disciplinary action or termination. The decision of the appointing authority shall be final except as provided by KRS 18A.095(14) and

18A.140

. A federally funded time-limited employee shall not have the right of appeal to the Personnel Board except as provided by KRS 18A.095(14) and

18A.140

;

“Federally funded position” means a full-time or a part-time position in which the unclassified employee is eligible for benefits at the same level as a classified employee in a permanent position;

“Full-time employee” means an employee in a full-time position;

“Full-time position” means a position, other than an interim position, requiring an employee to work at least thirty-seven and one-half (37.5) hours in a work week, except for the following:

Positions in the state parks, where the work assigned is dependent upon fluctuations in tourism, may be assigned work hours from twenty-five (25) hours per week during the off seasons and remain in full-time positions; and

Positions in health care facilities, which regularly involve three (3) consecutive days of twelve (12) hour shifts to cover weekends, shall be considered full-time;

“Initial probation” means the period of service following initial appointment to any position under KRS

18A.010

to

18A.200

which requires special observation and evaluation of an employee’s work and which must be passed successfully before status may be conferred as provided in KRS

18A.110

and by the provisions of this chapter. If the appointee is granted leave in excess of twenty (20) consecutive work days during this period, his initial probation shall be extended for the same length of time as the granted leave to cover such absence;

“Interim employee” means an unclassified employee without status who has been appointed to an interim position that shall be less than nine (9) months duration;

“Interim position” means a position established to address a one-time or recurring need of less than nine (9) months duration and exempt from the classified service under KRS

18A.115

;

“Part-time employee” means an employee in a part-time position;

“Part-time position” means a position, other than an interim position, requiring an employee to work less than one hundred (100) hours per month;

“Penalization” means demotion, dismissal, suspension, fines, and other disciplinary actions; involuntary transfers; salary adjustments; any action that increases or diminishes the level, rank, discretion, or responsibility of an employee without proper cause or authority, including a reclassification or reallocation to a lower grade or rate of pay; and the abridgment or denial of other rights granted to state employees;

“Position” means an office or employment in an agency (whether part-time, full-time, or interim, occupied, or vacant) involving duties requiring the services of one (1) person;

“Promotion” means a change of rank of an employee from a position in one (1) class to a position in another class having a higher minimum salary or carrying a greater scope of discretion or responsibility;

“Promotional probation” means the period of service, consistent with the length of the initial probationary period, following the promotion of an employee with status which must be successfully completed in order for the employee to retain the position to which he has been promoted. If the employee is granted leave in excess of twenty (20) consecutive work days during this period, his promotional probation shall be extended for the same length of time as the granted leave to cover such absence;

“Qualifying” means the selection method type which results when the knowledge, skills, and abilities necessary for a job classification cannot be accurately measured by written examination;

“Reallocation” means the correction of the classification of an existing position by placement of the position into the classification that is appropriate for the duties the employee has been and shall continue to perform;

“Reclassification” shall mean the change in the classification of an employee when a material and permanent change in the duties or responsibilities of that employee has been assigned in writing by the appointing authority;

“Reemployment” shall mean the rehiring of an employee with status who has been laid-off;

“Reemployment register” means the separate list of names of persons who have been separated from state service by reason of lay-off. Reemployment registers shall be used as provided by the provisions of KRS

18A.110

,

18A.130

, and

18A.135

;

“Register” means any official list of eligibles for a particular class and, except as provided in this chapter, placed in rank order according to the examination scores maintained for use in making original appointments or promotions to positions in the classified service;

“Reinstatement” means the privilege of restoration of an employee who has resigned in good standing at the option of the appointing authority, or who has been ordered reinstated by the board or a court to a position in his former class, or to a position of like status and pay;

“Reversion” means either the returning of a status employee to his or her last position held in the classified service, if vacant, or the returning of a status employee to a vacant position in the same or similar job classification as his or her last position held in the classified service. Reversion occurs after a career employee is terminated other than for cause from the unclassified service or after a status employee fails to successfully complete promotional probation. Reversion after unsuccessful completion of promotional probation, or in the case of a career employee after termination from the unclassified service, may only be appealed to the Personnel Board under KRS 18A.095(12);

“Seniority” means the total number of months of state service;

“Status” means the acquisition of tenure with all rights and privileges granted by the provisions of this chapter after satisfactory completion of the initial probationary period by an employee in the classified service; and

“Transfer” means a movement of any employee from one (1) position to another of the same grade having the same salary ranges, the same level of responsibility within the classified service, and the same salary received immediately prior to transfer.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 494, § 7, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 129, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 203, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 309, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 154, § 10, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 540, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 91, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 122, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 127, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2009, ch. 75, § 14, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 153, § 1, effective April 13, 2010.

18A.010.
General purpose of KRS 18A.005 to 18A.200 — Total number of employees limited.

The general purpose of KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

is to establish for the state a system of personnel administration based on merit principles and scientific methods governing the recruitment, examination, appointment, promotion, transfer, lay-off, removal, discipline, and welfare of its classified employees and other incidents of state employment. All appointments and promotions to positions in the state classified service shall be made solely on the basis of merit and fitness, to be ascertained by competitive examination, except as hereinafter specified. The General Assembly finds that this chapter is necessary in order to improve the morale and motivation of state employees and to gain the maximum utilization of human resources in order to provide better service to the citizens of this Commonwealth.

The total number of permanent full-time personnel employed in agencies of the executive branch shall not exceed thirty-three thousand (33,000).

The provisions of subsection (2) of this section do not apply to teachers, career guidance coaches and counselors, or school administrators employed in state-operated area technology centers, or employees of the General Assembly, the Legislative Research Commission, the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority, the Kentucky Higher Education Student Loan Corporation, or the Court of Justice.

As used in this section, “career guidance coach” has the same meaning as in KRS

158.810

.

History.

Enact. 1982, ch. 381, § 8, effective July 15, 1982; repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1996, ch. 350, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 2012, ch. 150, § 8, effective April 19, 2012.

18A.015.
Creation of Personnel Cabinet — Provision for administrative costs.

There shall be created by KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

a Personnel Cabinet headed by a secretary who shall be appointed by the Governor.

Appropriations shall be made from the general expenditure fund to the cabinet to meet the estimated pro rata share of the cost of administering the provisions of this chapter for departments, commissions, boards, or agencies which receive their sole support from the general expenditure fund.

The secretary shall maintain accurate records reflecting the cost of administering the provisions of this chapter. At the close of each quarter year period he shall summarize the cost and shall bill each department, commission, board, or agency which receives support from sources other than the general expenditure fund, except the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources, for a pro rata share of the administrative cost based on the relationship between the quarterly average number of employees in the service of such department, commission, board, or agency and the quarterly average number of employees in the service of all the departments, commissions, boards, and agencies for the appropriate calendar quarter.

All departments, commissions, boards, or agencies which receive support from other than the general expenditure fund, except the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources, shall include in their budgets sufficient amounts to meet their pro rata shares of the cost of administering KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

and shall remit such shares quarterly to the department in the manner provided by law.

The cabinet is authorized and directed to accept on behalf of the state any grant or contribution, federal or otherwise, made to assist in meeting the cost of carrying out the purposes of KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 154, § 11, effective July 15, 1998.

Compiler's Notes.

This section was formerly compiled as KRS

18.160

and was repealed, reenacted and amended as this section by Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 3.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

18A.020.
Records of Personnel Cabinet subject to open records law — Employee access to personnel files.

The records of the cabinet shall be public records and shall be open to public inspection, as provided in KRS

61.870

to

61.884

.

A personnel file shall be maintained by the cabinet and the appointing authority for each employee. The file maintained by the cabinet shall be the official personnel file for the employee. Upon transfer, the personnel file maintained by the appointing authority from which the employee transfers shall be forwarded to the new appointing authority;

Each file shall include, but not be limited to, for each employee, his name, address, title of positions held, classification, rates of compensation, all changes in status including evaluations, promotions, demotions, lay-offs, transfers, disciplinary actions, commendations, awards, and preliminary and other supporting documentation for each action. Each file shall contain the complete record and supporting documentation for each personnel action;

Whenever an employee is reprimanded for misconduct, other infraction, or failure to perform his duties in a proper or adequate manner, the supervising employee taking such action shall document such action in detail, and shall provide the employee with a copy of such documentation. The supervising employee shall inform the employee that he has the right to prepare a written response to the action taken after he has reviewed the written documentation prepared by the supervising employee. Such response shall be attached to the documentation prepared by the supervising employee. The supervising employee shall place a copy of the documentation and response provided for herein in the employee’s personnel file and shall transmit a copy to the cabinet to be placed in the official personnel file of the employee. The supervising employee shall notify the employee that copies of the documentation and the response provided for herein have been placed in his personnel files.

Upon written request, an employee shall have the right to examine his personnel file. An employee may comment in writing on any item in his file. Such comments shall be made a part of his file and shall be attached to the specific record or document to which they pertain.

Upon written request a state employee, an applicant for employment, and an eligible on a register shall have the right to inspect and to copy any record and preliminary documentation and other supporting documentation that relates to him, except that an applicant, an eligible, or a state employee shall not have the right to inspect or to copy any examination materials.

No public agency, as defined by KRS

61.870

, and no officer or employee shall deny, abridge, or impede the exercise of the rights granted in any manner by this section and by KRS

61.878

.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 494, § 8, effective July 15, 1986; 1998, ch. 154, § 12, effective July 15, 1998.

Compiler's Notes.

This section was formerly compiled as KRS

18.290

and was repealed, reenacted and amended as this section by Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 4.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

18A.025.
Appointment of secretary of Personnel Cabinet — Responsibilities — Organization and duties of cabinet.

The Governor shall appoint the secretary of personnel as provided in KRS

18A.015

, who shall be considered an employee of the state. The secretary shall be a graduate of an accredited college or university and have at least five (5) years’ experience in personnel administration or in related fields, have known sympathies with the merit principle in government and shall be dedicated to the preservation of this principle. Additional education may be substituted for the required experience and additional experience may be substituted for the required education.

The secretary of the Personnel Cabinet or the secretary’s designee, shall be responsible for the coordination of the state’s affirmative action plan, established by KRS

18A.138

.

There is established within the Personnel Cabinet the following offices, departments, and divisions, each of which shall be headed by either a commissioner, executive director, or division director appointed by the secretary, subject to the prior approval of the Governor pursuant to KRS

12.040

or

12.050

, depending on the level of the appointment, except that the Kentucky Employees Deferred Compensation Authority shall be headed by an executive director who shall be appointed by the authority’s board of directors:

Office of the Secretary, which shall be responsible for communication with state employees about personnel and other relevant issues and for the administration and coordination of the following:

Office of Employee Relations, composed of the following programs:

Workers’ Compensation Program pursuant to KRS

18A.375

;

Sick leave Sharing Program, pursuant to KRS

18A.197

;

Annual Leave Sharing Program, pursuant to KRS

18A.203

;

Health and Safety Program;

Employee Assistance Program;

Employee Incentive Programs, pursuant to KRS

18A.202

;

Employee Mediation Program; and

Living Organ Donor Leave Program, pursuant to KRS

18A.194

;

Office of Administrative Services, which shall be responsible for the Personnel Cabinet’s administrative functions, composed of the following programs:

Division of Technology Services;

Division of Human Resources; and

Division of Financial Services;

Office of Legal Services, which shall provide legal services to the Personnel Cabinet and to executive branch agencies and their representatives upon request;

Office of Diversity, Equality, and Training, which shall coordinate and implement diversity initiatives for state agencies, the affirmative action plan established by KRS

18A.138

, the state Equal Employment Opportunity Program, and the Minority Management Trainee Program;

Governmental Services Center, which shall be responsible for employee and managerial training and organizational development;

Kentucky Public Employees Deferred Compensation Authority, which shall maintain a deferred compensation plan for state employees; and

Office of Public Affairs, which shall assist in all aspects of developing and executing the strategic direction of the cabinet;

Department of Human Resources Administration, which shall be composed of the:

Division of Employee Management, which shall be responsible for payroll, records, classification, and compensation. The division shall also be responsible for implementing lay-off plans mandated by KRS

18A.113

to 118A.1132 and shall monitor and assist state agencies in complying with the provisions of the federal Fair Labor Standards Act. The division shall:

Maintain the central personnel files mandated by KRS

18A.020

and process personnel documents and position actions;

Operate and maintain a uniform payroll system and certify payrolls as required by KRS

18A.125

;

Maintain plans of classification and compensation for state service and review and evaluate the plans; and

Coordinate and implement the employee performance evaluation systems throughout state government; and

Division of Career Opportunities, which shall be responsible for employment counseling, applicant processing, employment register, and staffing analysis functions. The division shall:

Operate a centralized applicant and employee counseling program;

Operate, coordinate, and construct the examination program for state employment;

Prepare registers of candidate employment; and

Coordinate outreach programs, such as recruitment and the Administrative Intern Program; and

Department of Employee Insurance, which shall be responsible for the:

Health Insurance Program, pursuant to KRS

18A.225

;

Flexible Benefit Plan, pursuant to KRS

18A.227

;

Division of Insurance Administration, which shall be responsible for enrollment and service functions;

Division of Financial and Data Services, which shall be responsible for fiscal and data analysis functions; and

Life Insurance Program pursuant to KRS

18A.205

to

18A.220

.

The cabinet shall include principal assistants appointed by the secretary, pursuant to KRS

12.050

or 18A.115(1)(g) and (h), as necessary for the development and implementation of policy. The secretary may employ, pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, personnel necessary to execute the functions and duties of the department.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 346, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 404, § 8, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 98, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 494, § 9, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 116, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 82, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 154, § 13, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 97, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 70, § 2, effective March 15, 2001; 2002, ch. 122, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 97, § 2, effective June 20, 2005; 2012, ch. 10, § 2, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 111, § 2, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 15, 2020.

Compiler's Notes.

This section was formerly compiled as KRS

18.180

(Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 63, § 7; 1966, ch. 255, § 22; 1972, ch. 13, § 4; 1982, ch. 393, § 13) and was repealed, reenacted and amended as this section by Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 5.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts ch. 97, sec. 2, amends this section to insert a reference to “KRS

18A.115

(g) and (h)” in subsection (4). Because only subsection (1) of KRS

18A.115

contains paragraphs (g) and (h), and those paragraphs relate to principal assistants exempted from classified service, the reference has been changed in codification to “KRS 18A.115(1)(g) and (h)” under KRS 7.136(1)(e) and (h).

(6/20/2005). The Reviser of Statutes has renumbered the subparagraphs of subsection (3)(a) of this statute and deleted the word “which” under the authority of KRS 7.136(1)(a) and (h).

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Compensation, KRS

64.640

.

18A.030.
Duties of secretary.

The secretary shall be the executive and administrative head of the cabinet and shall supervise and control all examinations and work of the cabinet. He shall advise the board on matters pertaining to the classified service of this state. Within the limitations of the budget, the secretary shall appoint and supervise the staff needed in the cabinet to carry out the purposes of KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

except employees of the board who shall be appointed as provided in KRS

18A.090

.

Subject to the provisions of this chapter and KRS Chapter 13A, the secretary shall, with the aid of his staff:

Attend all meetings of the board;

As provided by this chapter, promulgate comprehensive administrative regulations consistent with the provisions of KRS Chapters 13A and 18A, and with federal standards for the administration of a personnel system in the agencies of the state government receiving federal grants;

Establish general procedures for personnel recruitment, for certification, and for improving the efficiency of employed personnel;

Appoint the examiners and technicians necessary for the conduct of the personnel program, whether on a permanent or temporary basis;

Prepare and maintain a record of all employees, showing for each employee his name, address, title of position held, rate of compensation, changes in status, compensation, or title, transfer, and to make the data and the class specifications for all positions available to the press and public;

Prepare, in accordance with the provisions of KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

and the administrative regulations adopted thereunder, examinations, eligible lists, and ratings of candidates for appointment;

Make certification for appointment or promotion within the classified service, in accordance with the provisions of KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

;

Make investigations concerning all matters touching the enforcement and effect of the provisions of KRS 18A.005 to 18A.200 and administrative regulations prescribed thereunder;

Prepare, in cooperation with appointing authorities and others, programs for employee training, safety, morale, work motivation, health, counseling, and welfare, and exercise leadership in the development of effective personnel administration within the several departments of the Commonwealth, and make available the facilities of the department to this end;

Provide personnel services to unclassified employees in agreement with the agencies involved not otherwise provided for in KRS 18A.005 to 18A.200;

Present, in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 48, budget requests for the support of the personnel system created by KRS 18A.005 to 18A.200, excluding the board, which shall present its own budget estimates;

Make a report and submit the same to the board, the Legislative Research Commission, and the Governor not later than October first of each year;

Propose selection method changes for any classification to the Personnel Board with documentation justifying the need for the selection method change. The Personnel Board shall, at its next regularly scheduled monthly meeting, review and comment on any proposed selection method change. A classification shall not have its selection method changed without review and comment by the Personnel Board; and

Discharge the other duties imposed upon him by KRS 18A.005 to 18A.200.

The secretary on behalf of the cabinet may join or subscribe to any association or service having as its purpose the interchange of information relating to the improvement of the public service and especially improvement of personnel administration.

The secretary shall keep records relative to employee turnover and report to the board, the Governor, and the Legislative Research Commission quarterly. The report shall reflect employee turnover rates by cabinet, department, bureau, division, and section. If any cabinet, department, bureau, division, or section has a turnover rate of fifteen percent (15%) or more in any twelve (12) month period, the secretary shall conduct an investigation into the reasons for the turnover and report the findings to the board, the Governor, and the Legislative Research Commission.

The secretary shall provide to each new state employee and to each existing state employee, classified or otherwise, on an annual basis an informational pamphlet about human immunodeficiency virus infection and acquired immunodeficiency syndrome. The pamphlet shall be approved by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services and shall contain information about the nature and extent of these diseases, methods of transmission, preventive measures, and referral services.

The secretary shall establish and maintain a list of all filled positions exempted from classified service under KRS 18A.115(1) (e), (g), (h), (i), (k), (t), (w), (aa), and (ab). The list shall include the following information for each filled position:

The name of the agency where the position is assigned;

The statutory authority for the unclassified status of the position;

The title of the position;

The pay grade of the position;

The annual salary of the employee in the position; and

The work county of the employee in the position.

Beginning September 1, 2010, and every six (6) months thereafter, the secretary shall provide the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission with a copy of the list described in subsection (6) of this section, and shall indicate on the list any position that has been added to the list since the last submission.

The secretary shall perform organizational analysis and review.

HISTORY:

Repealed, reenact. and amend. Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 6, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 450, § 53, effective July 1, 1983; 1986, ch. 494, § 10, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 443, § 31, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 154, § 14, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 426, § 77, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 95, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 153, § 2, effective April 13, 2010; 2017 ch. 53, § 2, effective June 29, 2017.

Compiler's Notes.

This section was formerly compiled as KRS

18.190

and was repealed, reenacted and amended as this section by Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 6.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A state agency legally may grant tuition assistance or tuition reimbursement to a state employee based on KRS

164.357

which gives authority for coordination, implementation, and approval of training and employee development programs to the Governmental Services Center.

OAG 91-120

.

18A.032.
Applicants to and eligibles for the classified service — Examination — Placement on and removal from registers — Certification for employment.

Except as provided by the provisions of this chapter, the secretary may refuse to examine an applicant; or, after examination, may disqualify an applicant, remove his name from a register, refuse to certify any eligible on a register, or may consult with the appointing authority in taking steps to remove such person already appointed if:

It is found that he does not meet any one (1) of the preliminary requirements established for the examination for the class of position;

He is unable to perform the duties of the class;

He has made a false statement of material fact in his application;

He has used or attempted to use political pressure or bribery to secure an advantage in the examination;

He has directly or indirectly obtained information regarding the examination to which, as an applicant, he was not entitled;

He has failed to submit his application correctly or within the prescribed time limits;

He has taken part in the compilation, administration, or correction of the examination for which he is an applicant;

He has previously been dismissed from a position in the state service for cause or has resigned while charges for dismissal for cause of which he had knowledge were pending;

He has been convicted of a felony within the preceding five (5) years and his civil rights have not been restored or he has not been pardoned by the Governor;

He has been convicted of a job related misdemeanor, except that convictions for violations of traffic regulations shall not constitute grounds for disqualification; or

He has otherwise willfully violated the provisions of this chapter.

An eligible may be removed from a register:

If the eligible cannot be located by postal authorities at the last address provided by the eligible;

If the eligible responds in writing that he no longer desires consideration for position in that class;

If the eligible declines an offer of probationary appointment to the class for which the register was established;

If it is shown that the eligible is not qualified or is unsuitable for appointment to the class for which the register is established;

If the eligible fails to reply within a period of ten (10) calendar days of the receipt of the written request of the appointing authority for an interview, or fails to appear for an interview which he has scheduled with the appointing authority without good cause;

If the eligible accepts an appointment and fails to present himself for duty at the time and place agreed to without giving reasons for the delay satisfactory to the appointing authority; or

If the eligible states in writing that he is not available for appointment or does not wish to be considered for appointment.

When an eligible notifies the cabinet in writing that he is unavailable for employment or employment consideration, the cabinet may remove the name of that eligible from the appropriate register without further notification to the person.

When the cabinet is notified in writing by an appointing authority that an eligible has accepted a bona fide offer of probationary appointment to any position, effective on a specified date, his name may be removed from the register for all classes for which the maximum salary is the same or less than that of the class to which he has been appointed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 494, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 190, § 1, effective April 4, 1988; 1998, ch. 154, § 15, effective July 15, 1998.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

18A.035.
Delegation of secretary’s powers — Assistance in testing — Membership on Kentucky Employees Retirement System board.

The secretary may from time to time designate in writing an employee of the cabinet to act for him in case of his absence or inability from any cause to discharge the powers and duties of his position. In this case, the powers and duties of the secretary shall devolve upon his designee.

The secretary may request appropriate persons, including officers and employees in the state service, to assist in the preparation and rating of tests. Department heads shall cooperate to the fullest extent possible in making the services of their employees available for such work.

The secretary may enter into written agreements with an appointing authority which would provide for the delegation of his authority and power to the appointing authority. The secretary is prohibited from delegating any powers or authority pertaining to disciplinary actions, lay-offs, or registers.

All written agreements delegating the secretary’s power and authority as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be specific in nature and renewed annually.

A copy of the written agreements shall be forwarded to the Personnel Board.

The secretary shall serve ex officio as a member of the board of trustees of the Kentucky Employees Retirement System.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 63, §§
8 and 17; repealed and reenact., Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 7, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 180, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 154, § 16, effective July 15, 1998.

Compiler's Notes.

This section was formerly compiled as KRS

18.200

and was repealed and reenacted as this section by Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 7.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

18A.037.
New system of job classification and compensation.

The commissioner shall develop and propose a new system of classification and compensation to be transmitted to the Legislative Research Commission by November 15, 1997. The system proposed by the commissioner shall be developed using a nationally-recognized system for evaluating job requirements. The proposed system shall determine the requirements of each job classification by using factors such as, but not limited to, knowledge, skill, effort, responsibility, accountability, problem solving, discretion, challenge, and working conditions, to ensure pay equity as required by KRS Chapters 337 and 344.

The commissioner shall include, as a part of the proposal, estimated funding requirements for the implementation of the system.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 296, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 487, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

18A.040.
Compliance with federal standards.

The board and the secretary shall see that rules, regulations and practices meeting federal merit system standards shall, where such standards apply as a prerequisite for federal grants-in-aid, be in effect continuously, notwithstanding any other provision of KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 8, effective July 15, 1982; 2010, ch. 153, § 3, effective April 13, 2010.

Compiler's Notes.

This section was formerly compiled as KRS

18.340

and was repealed, reenacted and amended as this section by Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 8.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.